Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.130

Procedure specified for establishment, construction, and maintenance.

The laying out, construction, and maintenance of all county roads shall hereafter be in accordance with the following procedure:

On or before the first Monday in October of each year each county road engineer shall file with the county legislative authority a recommended plan for the laying out, construction, and maintenance of county roads for the ensuing fiscal year. Such recommended plan need not be limited to but shall include the following items: Recommended projects, including capital expenditures for ferries, docks, and related facilities, and their priority; the estimated cost of all work, including labor and materials for each project recommended; a statement as to whether such work is to be done by the county forces or by publicly advertised contract; a list of all recommended purchases of road equipment, together with the estimated costs thereof. Amounts to be expended for maintenance shall be recommended, but details of these proposed expenditures shall not be made. The recommended plan shall conform as nearly as practicable to the county's long range road program.

After filing of the road engineer's recommended plan, the county legislative authority shall consider the same. Revisions and changes may be made until a plan which is agreeable to a majority of the members of the county legislative authority has been adopted: PROVIDED, That such revisions shall conform as nearly as practicable to the county's long range road program. Any appropriations contained in the county road budget shall be void unless the county's road plan was adopted prior to such appropriation.

The final road plan for the fiscal year shall not thereafter be changed except by unanimous vote of the county legislative authority.

[ 2005 c 162 s 2; 1991 c 363 s 86; 1975 1st ex.s. c 21 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.81.130. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-8f.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.